Utah statutes.
78B-6-302.   Contempt in immediate presence of court -- Summary action -- Outside presence of court -- procedure.

(1)  When a contempt is committed in the immediate view and presence of the court, or judge at chambers, it may be punished summarily.  An order shall be made, reciting the facts occurring in the immediate view and presence of the court.  The order shall state that the person proceeded against is guilty of a contempt and shall be punished as prescribed in Section 78B-6-310.

(2)  When the contempt is not committed in the immediate view and presence of the court or judge, an affidavit or statement of the facts by a judicial officer shall be presented to the court or judge of the facts constituting the contempt.

